South Dakota, session 2026, SB245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-13:
There is created in the state treasury the homeowner property tax reduction fund.
The Department of Revenue shall administer the fund. The purpose of the fund is
to provide property tax relief for owner-occupied single-family dwellings. Moneys in the
fund must be used to reduce the local effort for general education levies on owner-
occupied single-family dwellings.
Interest on moneys credited to the fund must remain in the fund. Expenditures
from the fund must be budgeted through the general appropriation bill.
Moneys in the fund may not be transferred to the general fund.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-13:
The treasurer shall deposit in the homeowner property tax reduction fund
established in section 1 of this Act, the applicable percent of taxes collected on or after
August 1, 2027, pursuant to:
(1) Chapter 10-45;
(2) Chapter 10-46;
(3) Chapter 10-46E; and
(4) Chapter 10-58.
For purposes of this section, "applicable percent" means three-tenths percent
divided by the tax rate provided for the taxes referenced in subdivisions (1) to (4),
inclusive, of this section, as applicable.
Section 3. That § 10-46-48 be AMENDED:

26.859.15 2 245
10-46-48. All revenue arising under the operation of this chapter shall
immediately be turned over to the state treasurer and by him credited to the general fund,
except as otherwise provided in section 2 of this Act.
Section 4. That § 10-46E-9 be AMENDED:
10-46E-9. The revenue from the tax imposed by this chapter shall be deposited
in the general fund, except as otherwise provided in section 2 of this Act.
Section 5. That § 10-58-5 be AMENDED:
10-58-5. The tax generated by this chapter must be deposited in the general fund,
except as otherwise provided in section 2 of this Act.
Section 6. On July 1, 2026, the state treasurer shall transfer $55,896,576 from the general
revenue replacement fund to the homeowner property tax reduction fund.
Section 7. Sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this Act are effective beginning July 1, 2027.
SB245 ENROLLED

26.859.15 3 245
An Act to create the homeowner property tax reduction fund, and to transfer moneys to the
homeowner property tax reduction fund.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 245
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 245 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB245 ENROLLED